Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-108
National Guard; organization; federal regulations.

The organization of the National Guard, including the composition of all units thereof, shall be such as is or may hereafter be prescribed for this state by the United States or by regulations of the Department of the Army and Department of the Air Force.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 6, p. 659;

C.S.1929, § 55-111;

R.S.1943, § 55-109;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 7, p. 595;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-109;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 6, p. 1583.